Illinois, session 104th, SB3062.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 7-19 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/7-19)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7-19)7    Sec. 7-19. The primary ballot of each political party for 8each precinct shall be arranged and printed substantially in 9the manner following:10    1. Designating words. At the top of the ballot shall be 11printed in large capital letters, words designating the 12ballot, if a Republican ballot, the designating words shall 13be: "REPUBLICAN PRIMARY BALLOT"; if a Democratic ballot the 14designating words shall be: "DEMOCRATIC PRIMARY BALLOT"; and 15in like manner for each political party.16    2. Order of Names, Directions to Voters, etc. Beginning 17not less than one inch below designating words, the name of 18each office to be filled shall be printed in capital letters. 19Such names may be printed on the ballot either in a single 20column or in 2 or more columns and in the following order, 21to-wit:22    President of the United States, State offices, 23congressional offices, delegates and alternate delegates to be   SB3062- 2 -LRB104 16950 SPS 30364 b1elected from the State at large to National nominating 2conventions, delegates and alternate delegates to be elected 3from congressional districts to National nominating 4conventions, member or members of the State central committee, 5trustees of sanitary districts, county offices, judicial 6officers, city, village and incorporated town offices, town 7offices, or of such of the said offices as candidates are to be 8nominated for at such primary, and precinct, township or ward 9committeepersons. If two or more columns are used, the 10foregoing offices to and including member of the State central 11committee shall be listed in the left-hand column and 12Senatorial offices, as defined in Section 8-3, shall be the 13first offices listed in the second column.14    Below the name of each office shall be printed in small 15letters the directions to voters: "Vote for one"; "Vote for 16not more than two"; "Vote for not more than three". If no 17candidate or candidates file for an office and if no person or 18persons file a declaration as a write-in candidate for that 19office, then below the title of that office the election 20authority instead shall print "No Candidate". 21    Next to the name of each candidate for delegate or 22alternate delegate to a national nominating convention shall 23appear either (a) the name of the candidate's preference for 24President of the United States or the word "uncommitted" or 25(b) no official designation, depending upon the action taken 26by the State central committee pursuant to Section 7-10.3 of   SB3062- 3 -LRB104 16950 SPS 30364 b1this Act.2    Below the name of each office shall be printed in capital 3letters the names of all candidates, arranged in the order in 4which their petitions for nominations were filed, except as 5otherwise provided in Sections 7-14 and 7-17 of this Article. 6The lettering of candidate names on a ballot shall be in both 7capital and lowercase letters in conformance with standard 8English language guidelines, unless compliance is not feasible 9due to the election system utilized by the election authority. 10Opposite and in front of the name of each candidate shall be 11printed a square and all squares upon the primary ballot shall 12be of uniform size. The names of each team of candidates for 13Governor and Lieutenant Governor, however, shall be printed 14within a bracket, and a single square shall be printed in front 15of the bracket. Spaces between the names of candidates under 16each office shall be uniform and sufficient spaces shall 17separate the names of candidates for one office from the names 18of candidates for another office, to avoid confusion and to 19permit the writing in of the names of other candidates.20    Where voting machines or electronic voting systems are 21used, the provisions of this Section may be modified as 22required or authorized by Article 24 or Article 24A, whichever 23is applicable.24(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.)